Connecticut, session 2026, HB05541.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) As used in this section, "community
action agency" has the same meaning as provided in section 17b-885 of
the general statutes. Not later than October 1, 2026, the Commissioner
of Social Services shall file a status report on community action agencies,
in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
with the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to human services. The report shall
include, but need not be limited to:
(1) The number of community action agencies serving the state
compared to the number of such agencies serving the state in calendar
year 2021;
(2) To the extent not exempt from disclosure pursuant to section 1-
210 of the general statutes, a summary of any investigation and findings
of such investigation into a community action agency by the
Department of Social Services in each of the last two calendar years;
LCO No. 2935 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5541
(3) The number, names and location of any community action
agencies that lost their designation to serve communities pursuant to
section 17b-892 of the general statutes;
(4) Regions in the state that the commissioner determines are
underserved by community action agencies;
(5) An assessment of the health of community action agencies,
including, but not limited to, the real property and finances of such
agencies; and
(6) A summary of challenges facing community action agencies and
actions the state may take to support such agencies that are consistent
with federal law and regulations governing community action agencies.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section